Louisiana, session 2026, SB74.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1231.1(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1231.1. Definitions and general applications
A. As used in this Part:
* * *
(2) "Authority" means the Residual Malpractice Insurance Authority
established under Section 1231.7 R.S. 40:1231.7.
* * *